Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 51. ELEEMOSYNARY INSTITUTIONS

CHAPTER 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Art. 3183b-1. EMINENT DOMAIN BY CERTAIN NONPROFIT CHARITABLE CORPORATIONS.

Sec. 1. Except as provided by this section, and notwithstanding any other law, any nonprofit corporation incorporated under the laws of this state for purely charitable purposes and which is directly affiliated or associated with a medical center having a medical school recognized by the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association as an integral part of its establishment, and which has for a purpose of its incorporation the provision or support of medical facilities or services for the use and benefit of the public, and which is situated in any county of this state having a population in excess of six hundred thousand (600,000) inhabitants according to the most recent Federal Census shall have the power of eminent domain and condemnation for the purposes set forth in Section 2 and Section 3 of this Act. A charitable corporation described by this section may not exercise the power of eminent domain and condemnation to acquire a detached, single-family residential property or a multifamily residential property that contains eight or fewer dwelling units.

Sec. 2. ACQUISITION OF LANDS ADJACENT TO MEDICAL CENTER FOR CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF FACILITIES. Any charitable corporation as defined in Section 1 of this Act shall have the power of eminent domain and condemnation for the purpose of acquiring lands adjacent or contiguous (whether or not separated by public thoroughfares) to such medical center upon which are to be constructed, maintained, and operated as a part of the medical center, facilities dedicated to medical care, teaching, and research for the public welfare, including ancillary or service activities generally and customarily recognized as essential to such facilities in a medical center.

Sec. 3. ACQUISITION OF LANDS ADJACENT TO MEDICAL CENTER FOR PURPOSE OF CONVEYING OR LEASING; USE OF LANDS. Any charitable corporation as defined in Section 1 of this Act shall have the power of eminent domain and condemnation for the purpose of acquiring lands adjacent or contiguous (whether or not separated by public thoroughfares) to such medical center for the purpose of conveying or leasing such lands in the manner set forth in Section 4 of this Act to any nonprofit corporation, association, foundation or trust for the construction, maintenance, and operation of facilities to be a part of the medical center and dedicated to medical care, teaching, or research for the public welfare, including ancillary or service activities generally and customarily recognized as essential to such facilities in a medical center.

Sec. 4. AUTHORITY AND POWER TO CONTROL PROPERTY ACQUIRED; DEEDS OF CONVEYANCE OR LEASE. Any charitable corporation as defined in Section 1 of this Act in the exercise of the power of eminent domain conferred herein shall have full authority and power to control the property acquired for the purposes authorized herein, and shall have the authority to convey such property or to lease the same for a period of ninety-nine (99) years with an option to renew. Any deed of conveyance or lease as provided in Section 3 of this Act shall set forth the defeasance or conditions under which the property is conveyed or leased and the fact that it is dedicated to medical care, teaching, or research for the public welfare.

Sec. 5. REVERSION OF TITLE TO ORIGINAL OWNER. It is expressly provided that if any property acquired under authority of this Act is not used for the purpose of medical care, teaching, or research or essential ancillary and service activities, but use for such purposes is abandoned, title to the property shall revert to the original owner from whom such property was acquired by condemnation pursuant to this Act, or to his heirs, devisees, or assigns.

Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, the power of eminent domain granted by this Act shall be exercised in accordance with Chapter 21, Property Code.

(b) If a charitable corporation to which this Act applies seeks to acquire any real property by condemnation or seeks to purchase any real property that the corporation intends to use in a manner that would not comply with any deed restriction that applies to the property immediately before the purchase, before the charitable corporation initiates condemnation proceedings or records the deed conveying title to the property the charitable corporation shall, in addition to providing any other notice required by law, provide written notice by certified mail to the owner of record, as recorded in the real property records of the county, of each unit of real property:

(1) that the charitable corporation seeks to acquire or purchase; or

(2) that is not more than 200 feet from any boundary of any unit of real property the charitable corporation seeks to acquire or purchase.

Acts 1959, 56th Leg., p. 367, ch. 178, eff. Aug. 11, 1959.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 7), Sec. 6, eff. November 18, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 81 (S.B. 18), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2011.